Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. Wyoming Emergency Medical Services Act

§ 33-36-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Emergency Medical Services Act of 1977”.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-444.1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

§ 33-36-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Ambulance” means:

Any land motor vehicle maintained, operated or advertised for the medical care and transportation of patients upon any street, highway or public way;

Any land motor vehicle owned and operated on a regular basis by the state of Wyoming or any agency, municipality, city, town, county or political subdivision of Wyoming for medical care and transportation of patients upon any street, highway or public way; and

Any aircraft which is maintained, operated or advertised for the medical care and transportation of patients in the state of Wyoming. This definition does not include any land motor vehicle or aircraft owned and operated by the United States.

“Ambulance business license” means a license issued under W.S.

33-36-104

which has not expired, been revoked or suspended;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37, § 2

“Authorization” means discretionary consent given to permit the actions of others;

“Division” means the designated division of the department of health which division shall be the state EMS authority for purposes of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

;

“Industrial ambulance” means any motor vehicle maintained and operated by an industrial company with the primary purpose of medical care and transportation of employees who are injured or taken ill;

“Patient” means an individual who is sick, injured or otherwise incapacitated or helpless;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation or group of individuals acting together for a common purpose, including the state of Wyoming and any agency, municipality, city, town, county or political subdivision of the state of Wyoming;

“Search and rescue” means persons organized, trained and equipped to provide assistance to patients, such assistance being primarily limited to location, initial treatment and removal from imminent danger and transportation to a medical facility;

“Emergency medical technician” means a person who has graduated from a division approved training program for emergency medical technicians and for purposes of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act means as defined in W.S.

33-26-202

;

“This act” means W.S.

33-36-101

through

33-36-115

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-445; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2009, ch. 147, § 2; 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “W.S.

33-36-101

through

33-36-115

” for “W.S.

33-36-101

through

33-36-113

” in (a)(xi).

Laws 2009, ch. 147, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 5, 2009.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “"Attendant" means a trained and qualified individual responsible for the care of patients in an ambulance but not involved in search and rescue operations.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-36-103.
Rules and regulations; procedure; initiation of proceedings.

The division after conferring with representatives of both the private and volunteer ambulance services in the state shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions and purposes of this act.

All rules, regulations and proceedings of the division shall be promulgated and conducted in compliance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The division may initiate proceedings under this act on its own motion or on the written complaint of any person.

The division shall prescribe rules and regulations which provide for the conditional licensure of applicants who have satisfied all licensing requirements adopted under this act except any requirements related to criminal history screenings and fingerprinting. A conditional license shall not be issued without a sworn statement from an applicant, on a form prepared by the division, establishing all facts and circumstances which, if true, would fully qualify the applicant for licensure. The division may refuse to issue a conditional license to any applicant whose application or sworn statement reveals the existence of any fact upon which licensure could be denied. A conditional license shall be revoked or not issued at any time the division gains knowledge of any fact that would disqualify the applicant from licensure.

The division shall recognize the practice requirements of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

, and shall prescribe any rules necessary for implementation of the compact.

The division shall administer the provisions of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

, including factoring the annual assessment required under the compact into its biennial budget if sufficient revenue is not collected pursuant to W.S.

33-36-110

to cover the costs of the assessment.

The division shall consider and process licenses for veterans of military service, military service members and the spouses of military service members pursuant to the requirements of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-446; 2015 ch. 152, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), deleted the last sentence, which read: “The rules and regulations prescribed and adopted may not be implemented until submitted to the Wyoming legislature for review and approval under procedures as the legislature may prescribe”; and added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a) and (c), see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

§ 33-36-104.
Ambulance business license; persons eligible; annual fee; renewal.

The division shall grant an ambulance business license to any person:

Who is or will be engaged in the ambulance business or services in the state of Wyoming;

Who submits an application and pays the fee for an ambulance business license to the division;

If all ambulances owned or operated by the person are maintained, equipped and manned as required by rules and regulations promulgated by the division under W.S.

33-36-103

; and

Who has furnished evidence to the division of the purchase of vehicle insurance required by the rules and regulations promulgated by the division under W.S.

33-36-103

.

There shall be an annual ambulance business license fee, to be determined by the division, but not to exceed forty dollars ($40.00). Each ambulance business license shall expire on December 31 each year and may be renewed for a period of one (1) year upon application and payment of the annual license fee, if the applicant meets all the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section and has complied with all other rules and regulations promulgated by the division concerning the operation of an ambulance business.

The initial licenses under this act shall be issued on or before January 1, 1978.

The division shall determine whether an applicant is eligible for an initial or renewal ambulance business license.

This act does not supersede any other laws of the state of Wyoming or any ordinances or regulations.

All fees collected under this section shall be placed in the state general fund.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-447.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (c) and (e), see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

§ 33-36-105.
Ambulance business license; not transferable; change of ownership.

An ambulance business license issued under this act shall not be sold, transferred or assigned by the holder. Any change of ownership of an ambulance business shall require a new application and a new ambulance business license.

A partnership or corporation which holds an ambulance license shall notify the division within thirty (30) days of the admission to or withdrawal of a partner from the partnership or any change of principal officers of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-448.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

§ 33-36-106.
Ambulance business license; suspension, revocation or refusal to renew.

The division after notice and hearing may revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any ambulance business license if the holder of the license fails to comply with the requirements of this act or any rule or regulation promulgated by the division hereunder as provided in W.S. 33-36-103(a) and (b).

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37, § 2.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-449; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2016 ch. 37, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 37 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section,” at the beginning of (a).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 37 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (b), which read: “Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 33-36-107.
Conducting ambulance business without license prohibited.

No person shall operate, conduct, maintain or otherwise engage in an ambulance business in this state after January 1, 1978, unless he holds an ambulance business license issued by the division.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-450.

§ 33-36-108.
Exemptions.

The following are exempted from the provisions of this act:

The occasional use of a privately owned vehicle or aircraft not designated as an ambulance and not ordinarily used in transporting patients or operating under the provisions of W.S.

1-1-120

, in the performance of a lifesaving act;

A vehicle rendering services as an ambulance in case of a major catastrophe or emergency when licensed ambulances based in the localities of the catastrophe or emergency are incapable of rendering the services required;

Ambulances based outside this state, except that any such ambulances receiving a patient within the state shall comply with the provisions of this act;

Vehicles owned and operated by any state agency, political subdivision or search and rescue squads;

All industrial ambulances operating within the state of Wyoming, with the exception of the requirement for annual reporting on such forms as required by rules and regulations. As used in this paragraph, “operating within Wyoming” includes operations on company premises or, when providing care at the request of or with the authorization of the public or local community emergency medical service, to persons injured or taken ill. Nothing in this paragraph affects exemptions under paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection;

Individuals involved in search and rescue activities; and

Volunteer ambulance services in an area in which no other ambulance services meeting the requirements of this act are located.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-451; 1996, ch. 95, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 38, §
2 indicated a change to subsection (a) of this section, but this indication was only included in the enrolled Act due to an editing error.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), and in subsections (a)(iii) and (a)(vii), see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

§ 33-36-109.
License officers.

The division may employ one (1) or more individuals as license officers to assist it in the performance of its duties.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-452.

§ 33-36-110.
Emergency medical technician licensing; persons eligible; biennial fee; renewal; waiver of requirements.

An emergency medical technician license shall be granted by the division to any individual who:

Submits an application for a license to the division and pays the fee established pursuant to subsection (k) of this section;

Has been examined and certified as an emergency medical technician by the division or who the division deems to be otherwise qualified; and

Meets any additional educational requirements under any rule or regulation promulgated by the division as provided in W.S. 33-36-103(a) and (b).

Each emergency medical technician license shall expire every other year at a date determined by the division and may be renewed for a period of two (2) years upon application and payment of the fee established pursuant to subsection (k) of this section. An initial or renewal license may be granted by the division once to each person for a period not to exceed three (3) years if educational requirements for the period are satisfied. The division shall determine whether an applicant is eligible for an initial or renewal license.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37 § 2.

The division may grant a waiver of the education and training requirements of this section upon application in cases where it finds that a waiver would be in the best interests of the public.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 37 § 2.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the division, the division shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

To the extent the right to practice in Wyoming is not already provided by the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

, and if necessary to manage an emergency in this state, the division may issue temporary emergency medical technician licenses to emergency medical technicians who are retired, who have an inactive license or who are licensed in another state without a valid Wyoming license. The temporary license shall be valid for not more than ninety (90) days and be issued pursuant to a streamlined procedure established by rules and regulations promulgated by the division.

The division shall recognize the right of emergency medical technician personnel licensed in another state to practice in Wyoming to the extent required by the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

.

The division shall establish in rule and regulation fees for issuing initial or renewal licenses under this section. Fees established pursuant to this section shall be in an amount to ensure that, to the extent practicable, the total revenue generated from the fees collected approximates, but does not exceed, the direct and indirect costs of administering the provisions of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

, including the costs of the assessment required under the compact.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-453; Laws 1985, ch. 139, § 1; 2016 ch. 37, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 37 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “emergency medical technician license” for “attendant certificate” in (a); “for a license” for “and pays the fee for an attendant certificate” in (a)(i); in (b), deleted the first sentence, rewrote former second sentence which read: “Each attendant license shall expire on December 31 every other year and may be renewed for a period of two (2) years upon application and payment of the biennial certification fee.” and deleted “attendant” following “initial or renewal” in the last sentence; and added (g) and (h).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 37 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (c), which read: “All fees collected under this section shall be placed in the state general fund”, former (e), which read: “The initial certification under this act will be issued on or after January 1, 1978”, and former (f), which read: “Persons not serving as attendants may be trained and certified as emergency medical technicians and have the certification renewed if requirements are satisfied.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “and pays the fee established pursuant to subsection (k) of this section” in (a)(i) and (b); in (h), added “To the extent the right to practice in Wyoming is not already provided by the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act,
W.S.

33-36-202

” at the beginning; and added (j) and (k).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (e), see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

§ 33-36-111.
Authorized acts of emergency medical technicians.

An individual who holds a valid emergency medical technician license issued by the division is authorized to perform any act authorized by division rules and regulations, under written or oral authorization of a licensed physician, and may provide emergency medical technician services in other states as permitted by the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

.

Nothing in this act or the rules or regulations issued thereunder shall be construed to authorize any medical treatment to be given to any person who objects thereto on religious grounds, or to authorize the transportation of such person to any hospital.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-454; 2016 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “An individual who holds a valid emergency medical technician license” for “An attendant who holds a valid attendant certificate.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added “and may provide emergency medical technician services in other states as permitted by the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act,
W.S.

33-36-202

” at the end of (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 33-36-102(a)(xi).

§ 33-36-112.
Enjoining or restraining unlawful acts.

Whenever any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute a violation of W.S.

33-36-103

,

33-36-111

or the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

, the division may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining those acts, and upon a showing by the division that the person has engaged or is about to engage in any illegal act, an injunction, restraining order or other appropriate order shall be granted by the court without bond. The division shall comply with the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

, when taking any action under this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-455; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, inserted “or the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act,
W.S.

33-36-202

,” and made a related change; and added the last sentence.

§ 33-36-113.
Violations; penalties; proceedings.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of W.S.

33-36-103

,

33-36-111

or the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.

33-36-202

, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both. If the division has reason to believe that any individual is liable to punishment under this section, it may certify the facts to the attorney general of Wyoming who may take appropriate action. The division shall comply with the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act when taking any action under this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-456; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, inserted “or the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act,
W.S.

33-36-202

,” and made a related change; and added the last sentence.

Severability. —

Laws 1977, ch. 168, § 2, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

§ 33-36-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2006, ch. 71, § 1, related to the free tuition and fees for education of survivors of deceased emergency medical technicians.

Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2007.

§ 33-36-115.
Emergency medical services sustainability trust account; account established; planning grants; implementation grants.

A trust account is created to be known as the emergency medical services sustainability trust account. The trust account shall consist of those funds designated to the account by law and all monies received from federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations to the trust account. The trust account is specifically empowered to accept grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations including those which are limited in their purposes by the grantor. Funds deposited within the trust account are intended to be inviolate and constitute a perpetual trust account which shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with preservation of the account corpus.

The state treasurer shall credit annually to an emergency medical services sustainability trust income account earnings from investment of the trust account corpus. The legislature may, from time to time, appropriate funds directly to the income account for distribution in accordance with the terms of this section. Such specially appropriated funds shall be credited directly by the state treasurer to the income account and are available to the division for award of grants as otherwise permitted by this section.

Individuals and other entities may also grant, give, transfer, bequeath or donate funds to the trust account or the income account. These funds shall be credited by the state treasurer to either the trust account or the income account, as appropriate, in a manner consistent with the conditions attached to their receipt.

Funds in the trust income account are continuously appropriated to the department for purposes of providing grants to improve the delivery and quality of emergency medical services as provided in this section.

The department shall establish by rule and regulation a grant application calendar and procedure for needs assessment grants, which shall include the following provisions:

An assessment of emergency medical services in a service area and an analysis of the current emergency medical services system including:

The level of volunteerism;

The level and period of certification;

Response times;

Billing practices;

Funding sources and budget sustainability; and

Call volume.

Needs assessment grants shall be for the purpose of assessing the provision of emergency medical services in a service area and preparing a master plan for an efficient, coordinated system of emergency medical service delivery, subject to the following:

Grant applications may be submitted by persons, entities or groups interested in improving emergency medical services in a proposed service area which shall correspond to a rural urban commuting area as defined by the United States department of agriculture. The grant application shall be signed by authorized representatives of all involved political subdivisions within the proposed service area;

The department shall review applications and, if it determines that further detailed assessment of emergency medical services in the proposed service area is appropriate and following consultation with the affected entities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, shall contract for an assessment in the service area of emergency medical services strengths, weaknesses and coverage gaps. The contractor conducting the assessment shall prepare a written report that shall include a master plan for a coordinated, efficient emergency medical service delivery system within the service area. The master plan shall identify the governmental or private entity that will oversee and coordinate implementation of the plan, the areas and entities included in the plan, an estimate of funds available to implement the plan and continuing revenue sources, the approximate number of volunteer and paid emergency medical technicians available to provide services in the area and include provision, if necessary, for transition from an all volunteer service model to one combining volunteer and paid technicians. The master plan shall identify major problems and opportunities concerning emergency medical services, and provide for a desired sequence of events for implementation of the plan;

Any needs assessment shall include consultation with the affected entities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, representatives of public, private and volunteer ambulance services in the proposed service area, county and local government organizations, hospitals furnishing emergency medical services and other appropriate stakeholders;

Any needs assessment shall provide for the collection of data by service area using a common benchmark, indicator and scoring format on emergency medical service workforce shortfalls, strengths and weaknesses of current service delivery models. The needs assessment shall build upon but avoid duplication of the study completed by the rural policy research institute for the Wyoming health care commission in June, 2007;

Grant applications shall include a commitment of local matching funds of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000.00).

Following completion of a needs assessment as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, a county, joint powers board or emergency medical services special district may apply for a grant to assist in the development and implementation of a master plan, subject to the following:

Grants shall be documented in writing signed by the department and an authorized representative of the grantee. The document shall specify the intended use of the funds to improve emergency medical service delivery by assisting with the cost of implementing the master plan;

Award of grants shall be based on demonstrable need. Those service areas demonstrating the greatest need, at the discretion of the department, shall be given the highest priority in receiving grants pursuant to this section;

Implementation grant applications shall include a working budget to demonstrate how the grant will be used to address revenue gaps on a temporary basis while transitioning to a defined time when revenue is expected to be sufficient to sustain services in the master plan service area not to exceed two (2) years.

The department is authorized to enter into contracts it deems appropriate to conduct and coordinate needs analyses and implementation grants authorized by this section, including contracts with local providers or other stakeholders to report on service needs in the respective service areas.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59 § 2.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 147, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2015 amendment,

deleted (g), pertaining to requirements for reports from the department of health to the legislature.

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of (a), substituted "by law" for "under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)" and added "net" following "highest."

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 147, § 3, provides: “(a) There is appropriated five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) from the tobacco trust fund income account to the emergency medical services sustainability trust account. This appropriation shall be used only for the purposes of W.S.

33-36-115

created by this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be expended and shall not be transferred for any other purpose.

“(b) There is appropriated fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) from the general fund to the emergency medical services sustainability trust income account. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purposes of W.S.

33-36-115

created by this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. Any unexpended monies in the income account shall not revert but shall remain in the account to be expended for the purposes specified in this act.

“(c) None of the appropriations in this section shall be included in the department's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 147, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2009.